src/fst/phonology.twolc
Alphabet 

  p t k a e i o u m n h b

  E:a E:i E:o E:u E:e
  R:p R:b R:t R:k

  @P.ACT3.ON@  @P.ACT1.ON@
  %+:0 %>:0 %^UM:0 %^INF:0 ;

Sets

  Cons = p t k b ; 
  Vow = a e i o u ;
  Nas = m n ;
  Segm = Cons Vow Nas ;

Rules

! bili>in --> bilhin
"Replace final i with h before suffixes beginning with i" 
i:h <=> _ %>:0 i ;

!€ bili%>in
!€ bilh0in

! man>bili --> mambili

"Nasal assimilation"
n:m <=> _ %>:0 b: ; 

!€ man%>bili
!€ mam0bili

! mambili --> mamili

"Nasal deletion"
b:0 <=> :m %>:0 _ ;

!€ mam%>bili
!€ mam00ili

"Infixation"
 %^INF:0 <=> #:0 Cons 0:u 0:m Segm+ _ ;


!	7. X:0 <=> ___ +:0 C:C 0:u 0:m V:V
	
! %^UM>bili --> bumili
!"Infix insertion"
!%^UM:0 <=> %>:0 _ @P.ACT1.ON@ ; 

!€ %^UM%>bili
!€ 00bumili

"R realisation as Consonant"
R:CC <=> _ E: %+: CC ; 
	where CC in Cons ;

"E realisation as Vowel"
E:VV <=> _ %+: (Cons:) VV ; 
	where VV in Vow ;
